District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.11

Limited law enforcement authority.

(a)

The Commissioner shall have the power to issue and serve subpoenas, to compel witnesses to appear and testify, and to produce all books, records, papers, or documents in any insurance investigation or examination.

(b)

Any willful false testimony by a witness before the Commissioner as to any material fact shall constitute perjury and shall be punished in the manner prescribed by law for such offense.

(c)

If any witness having been personally summoned shall neglect or refuse to obey the subpoena issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner may, through the Corporation Counsel, report that fact to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or one of the judges thereof and the Court, or any judge thereof, may compel obedience to the subpoena to the same extent as witnesses may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of the Court.

(d)

The Commissioner may administer oaths to witnesses summoned in any investigation or examination as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125k
as added Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-254, § 2(d), 50 DCR 233